Utah statutes.
32B-1-406.   Acceptance of identification.

(1)  An authorized person may accept as evidence of the legal age of the individual presenting the following:

(a)  proof of age; or

(b)  if a statement of age is required under Section 32B-1-405:

(i)  proof of age; and

(ii)  a statement of age.

(2)  A statement of age, if properly completed, signed, and filed in accordance with Section 32B-1-405, may be offered as a defense in a case when there is at issue the legality of:

(a)  selling, offering for sale, or furnishing an alcoholic product to the individual who signed the statement of age;

(b)  admitting the individual who signed the statement of age into a restricted area; or

(c)  allowing the individual who signed the statement of age to be employed in employment that under this title may not be obtained by a minor.

(3)  An authorized person may not accept a driving privilege card issued in accordance with Section 53-3-207 as evidence of the legal age of an individual.

